District of Columbia statutes.
6-751.05c

Acceptance of gifts and grants of smoke and carbon monoxide detectors, batteries, and funds; authority to purchase detectors and batteries.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Mayor may accept gifts and grants of smoke and carbon monoxide detectors, batteries, and funds to conduct a program to provide detectors and batteries free of charge to residents of the District, and to install or arrange for the installation of detectors free of charge to residents. The Mayor may use donated funds to purchase or contract to purchase smoke and carbon monoxide detectors and batteries to conduct the program. The funding source for such contracts shall include any funds annually appropriated for this purpose, any funds accepted under this section, and block grant and other grant monies as available.

June 20, 1978, D.C. Law 2-81, § 6c
as added Mar. 20, 2009, D.C. Law 17-313, § 2, 56 DCR 37